Mississippi, session 2026, HB4179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Jennifer Miles of Winston County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny in Winston County, on October 21, 2008, for which she was sentenced to serve five (5) years under the supervision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. She was discharged on December 5, 2012.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.